Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
323D

HEALTH
PLANNING AND RESOURCES DEVELOPMENT AND

HEALTH
CARE COST CONTROL

Part I. General Provisions

Section

323D-1 Purpose

323D-2 Definitions

Part II. State Health Planning and
Development Program

323D-11 State health planning and development
agency

323D-12 Health planning and development functions;
state

agency

323D-12.5 Repealed

323D-12.6 State health planning and development
special fund;

created; deposits; expenditures; fees

323D-13 Statewide health coordinating council

323D-13.5 Disqualification from position or
membership

323D-14 Functions; statewide health coordinating
council

323D-15 State health services and facilities plan

323D-16 Repealed

323D-17 Public hearings required

323D-18 Information required of providers

323D-18.5 Information from providers of health
insurance

323D-18.6 Confidentiality of information

Part III. Subarea Health Planning Councils

323D-21 Subarea health planning councils,
established

323D-22 Subarea health planning councils,
functions, quorum

and number of members necessary to take
valid action

323D-23 Subarea health planning councils,
composition,

appointment

323D-24 to 27 Repealed

Part IV. State Medical Facilities--Repealed

323D-31 to 33 Repealed

Part V. Certificate of Need

323D-41 Repealed

323D-42 Review panel

323D-43 Certificates of need

323D-44 Applications for certificates of need

323D-44.5 Administrative review of certain
applications for

certificate of need

323D-44.6 Review of certain applications for
certificate of

need; waiver

323D-44.7 Monitoring of approved certificates of
need

323D-45 Subarea council, review panel, and
statewide council

recommendations for issuance or denial of
certificates

of need

323D-45.1 Ex parte contacts prohibited

323D-45.2 Repealed

323D-45.3 Approval of applications required to meet
safety,

licensure, or accreditation standards

323D-46 Conditional certification

323D-46.1 Repealed

323D-46.2 Withdrawal of a certificate of need

323D-47 Request for reconsideration

323D-48 Judicial review of state agency decisions

323D-49 Certificates of need; licenses and permits

323D-50 Certificates of need, penalties

323D-51 Injunctive relief

323D-52 Letters of intent

323D-53 Periodic reports from health facilities

323D-54 Exemptions from certificate of need
requirements

323D-55 Repealed

Part VI. General Administration

323D-61 Personnel

323D-62 Rules

Part VII. Hospital Acquisition

323D-71 Definitions

323D-72 Acquisition of hospital

323D-73 Notice; procedures

323D-74 Hearings

323D-75 Review; decision; rules

323D-76 Acquisition in the public interest;
decision of

attorney general

323D-77 Acquisition; decision by agency

323D-78 Revocation; hearing

323D-79 Public interest

323D-80 License renewal

323D-81 Prior acquisitions

323D-82 Maintenance of services

323D-83 Statutory authority

Note

Chapter reenacted by L 1977, c 178, §2.

Chapter heading amended by L 1984, c 267, §1.

Cross References

Conformance with federal law, see §431:2-201.5.

Hawaii health authority, see chapter 322H.

Health maintenance organization act, see chapter 432D.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next